Utah statutes.
58-76-501.   Unlawful conduct.

In addition to the definition in Subsection 58-1-501(1), "unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  using the title "Professional Geologist" or any other words, letters, abbreviations, or designations, which represent recognized professional geological disciplines indicating that the person using them is a professional geologist, unless the person holds a valid license issued under this chapter; or

(2)  as a corporation, proprietorship, partnership, or limited liability company, engaging in or representing that the entity is engaging in the practice of geology before the public, unless at least one individual employee of the entity holds a valid license issued under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 218, 2002 General Session

